Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1319
Abandoned railroad line; removal of grade crossing protection devices.

Whenever a railroad line is abandoned, the department may remove grade crossing protection devices therefrom to protect the state's investment therein.

Laws 1979, LB 42, § 10;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 254.